lexc/verb/enhuige6.lexc
LEXICON Case1mely
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeomely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igeamely§n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^j§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§ess§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaamely§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
!+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetmely§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igeomely§tt§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igeomely§tt§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
!+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetmely§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igeomely§tt§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igeomely§tt§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igeomely§tt§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igeomely§tt§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igeamely§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^§igeamely§n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igeamely§n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§igeamely§§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb3mely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3mely;

LEXICON Case3mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb5mely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case5mely;

LEXICON Case5mely
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§eomely§tt      #;    ! t

LEXICON AddVerbkuzd
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repkuzd;

LEXICON Repkuzd
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§igeoue§g§AA§t  Imperkuzd;
                    Imper1kuzd;

LEXICON Verb
ing AddVerb5mely;
ing:inga AddVerb3mely;
küld AddVerbkuzd;
küzd AddVerbkuzd;
ring AddVerb5mely;
ring:ringa AddVerb3mely;
